Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Administration and Management

47-25-20.
Board of Commissioners created; members; term of office.

There is created the Board of Commissioners of the Magistrates Retirement Fund of Georgia. The board shall consist of seven members as follows:

The Governor or the Governor’s designee;

An appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General; and

Five chief magistrates who are members of the fund.

The members of the board provided for by paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed by the Governor. The first such members shall be appointed by the Governor to take office on July 1, 2006, for initial terms as follows: one such member shall be appointed for one year; two such members shall be appointed for terms of two years; and two such members shall be appointed for terms of three years. Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint successors upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of three years. All such members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Such members shall be eligible for reappointment to successive terms of office as members of the board.

The board shall elect a chairperson from among its own membership to serve for a term as established by rules of the board. Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. All members of the board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses incurred by them in carrying out their duties as members of the board.

In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the board, the remaining members of the board shall appoint a chief magistrate who is a member of the fund to fill such vacancy for the unexpired term.

The Council of Magistrate Court Judges shall be authorized to submit the names of nominees for each position on the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to this Code section. The Governor may consider such nominees in making such appointments, but it is specifically provided that all such appointments shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor, and the Governor shall not be required to make any appointments from nominees made by the Council of Magistrate Court Judges.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 2/HB 646.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” following “Five” in paragraph (a)(3); and deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” in subsection (d).

47-25-21.
Secretary-treasurer.

There is created the office of secretary-treasurer of the board. The secretary-treasurer shall be elected and appointed by the board and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. His or her compensation and duties may be fixed by the board. In addition to such salary, the secretary-treasurer shall receive credit for a sum of $1,250.00 per year as dues in the retirement system.

The board or the secretary-treasurer with the approval of the board may employ additional personnel to assist the board or secretary-treasurer in carrying out duties provided in this chapter. The compensation and duties of any such personnel shall be fixed by the board.

The secretary-treasurer shall be paid retirement benefits upon retiring as secretary-treasurer as provided in Article 5 of this chapter for a chief magistrate retiring with the highest benefit allowed by such article and shall be entitled to any retirement option allowed by such article.

The board shall have authority to require the secretary-treasurer to give a good and sufficient surety bond in an amount to be determined by the board. The bond shall be payable to the board and shall be conditioned upon the proper and faithful performance of the duties of the secretary-treasurer. The secretary-treasurer shall be required to make quarterly reports to the board, which reports shall show all receipts and disbursements in such form and in such manner as the board may require. He or she shall likewise be required quarterly to make a full account of all moneys or property coming into his or her hands on behalf of the board at any time.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 701, § 1/HB 292; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 3/HB 646.

The 2014 amendments.

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “The secretary-treasurer shall be paid retirement benefits upon retiring in an amount equal ot the minimum retirement benefit provided under Code Section 47-25-81.” for “The secretary-treasurer shall be paid retirement benefits upon retiring as secretary-treasurer as provided in Article 5 of this chapter for a full-time chief magistrate retiring with the highest benefit allowed by such article and shall be entitled to any retirement option allowed by such article.” in subsection (b). The second 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” in subsection (b). See the Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, the amendment of subsection (b) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2014, p. 701, § 1/HB 292, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 3/HB 646, due to irreconcilable conflict.

47-25-22.
Powers and duties.

The board is granted the following powers and duties:

To provide for the collection of all moneys provided in this chapter;

To pay the administrative expenses of the board;

To hear and decide all applications for retirement benefits under this chapter;

To make payment of all retirement benefits that may be determined to be due under the terms of this chapter;

To make all necessary rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, for its government and for the government of the employees of the board;

To determine and fix rules of eligibility of persons to receive retirement benefits;

To make refunds and repayments to persons who may be entitled to receive them; and

To keep all records of its meetings.

The board shall also have all powers necessary for the purpose of administering this chapter.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this subsection, the board is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Article 5 of this chapter for persons theretofore or thereafter retiring under this chapter. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board shall determine. No benefit increase shall be awarded under this paragraph greater than 1.5 percent in any six-month period.

No member shall receive a benefit increase under paragraph (1) of this subsection in any year in which he or she realizes a benefit increase by operation of Code Section 47-25-81.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2007, p. 62, § 1/SB 104.

47-25-23.
Control of funds; investments.

The board shall have control of all funds provided for in this chapter and all funds shall be received and disbursed from a special account to the credit of the board. The expenses of administering this fund and the benefits provided for in this chapter shall be paid from such funds. The board shall have authority to expend the funds in accordance with this chapter.

The board shall have full power to invest and reinvest such funds, subject to all the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.” Subject to such terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions, the board shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds are invested, including the proceeds of any investments and any money belonging to the fund.

The board is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments thereof, and to contract with such agents for their services as investment advisers and counselors, making recommendations for investments and making investments if the board so authorizes.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244.

47-25-24.
Gifts, grants, and bequests.

The board may take, by gift, grant, or bequest, any money, real or personal property, or any other thing of value and may hold or invest it for the use and purposes of the fund in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244.

47-25-25.
Permanent records.

The board shall keep permanent records of all persons who qualify to participate in the benefits of this chapter, an accurate record of all payments and disbursements, and a detailed record of all the acts and doings of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244.

47-25-26.
Annual audit of board activity.

The state auditor is authorized and directed to make an annual audit of the acts and doings of the board and to make a complete report of the same to the General Assembly in such detail as he or she may see fit. The state auditor shall also have the right to audit the affairs of the board and any of its employees at any time that he or she may see fit or at any time that he or she may be requested to do so by the board or by the Governor.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244.